Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1138
Violations; effect.

A violation of provisions of the Dentistry Practice Act relating to the administration of general anesthesia, deep sedation, moderate sedation, minimal sedation, or inhalation analgesia may result in action against the dentist's permit, license, or both pursuant to section 38-196.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 471;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 8.